Alabama, session 2026rs, SB70.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-6-111, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§13A-6-111
Page 1

"§13A-6-111
SB70 INTRODUCED
(a) A person is guilty of transmitting obscene material
to a child if the person transmits, by means of any computer
communication system allowing the input, output, examination,
or transfer of computer programs from one computer to another,
material which, in whole or in part, depicts actual or
simulated nudity, sexual conduct, or sadomasochistic abuse,
for the purpose of initiating or engaging in sexual acts with
the child or an individual the person believes to be a child.
(b) For the purposes of this section, a "child"
includes any person under 17 years of age.
(c) For purposes of determining jurisdiction, the
offense is committed in this state if the transmission that
constitutes the offense either originates in this state or is
received in this state.
(d) A person charged under this section shall be tried
as an adult and the record of the proceeding shall not be
sealed nor subject to expungement.
(e) Transmitting obscene material of engaging in sexual
intercourse, sodomy, or to engage in a sexual performance,
obscene sexual performance, or sexual conduct for his or her
benefit to a child A violation of this section is a Class B
felony."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2